Alaska statutes. Title 15. Elections.
Article 1. Executive.

Collateral references. —

25 Am. Jur. 2d, Elections, § 1 et seq.

38 Am. Jur. 2d, Governor, § 2.

29 C.J.S., Elections, § 1 et seq.

81A C.J.S., States, §§ 84, 130.

Sec. 15.35.010.
Election of governor and lieutenant governor.

A governor and lieutenant governor shall be elected at the general election in 1962 and every four years thereafter.

History.

(§ 7.01 ch 83 SLA 1960)